Idaho statutes. Title 37 FOOD, DRUGS, AND OIL
Chapter 27 UNIFORM CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES
§ 37-2738. Sentencing criteria in drug cases.

Any person who pleads guilty to, is found guilty of or has a judgment of conviction entered upon a violation of the provisions of subsection (a), (b), (c) or (e) of section 37-2732, Idaho Code, shall be sentenced according to the criteria set forth herein.

Prior to sentencing for a violation enumerated in subsection (1) of this section, the defendant shall undergo, at his own expense (or at county expense through the procedures set forth in chapters 34 and 35, title 31, Idaho Code), a substance abuse evaluation at a facility approved by the Idaho department of health and welfare. Provided however, if the defendant has no prior or pending charges under the provisions of subsection (a), (b), (c) or (e) of section 37-2732, Idaho Code, and the court does not have any reason to believe that the defendant regularly abuses drugs and is in need of treatment, the court may, in its discretion, waive the evaluation with respect to sentencing for a violation of subsection (b), (c)(3), or (e) of section 37-2732, Idaho Code, and proceed to sentence the defendant. The court may also, in its discretion, waive the requirement of a substance abuse evaluation with respect to a defendant’s violation of the provisions of subsection (a), (b), (c) or (e) of section 37-2732, Idaho Code, and proceed to sentence the defendant if the court has a presentence investigation report, substance abuse assessment, criminogenic risk assessment, or similar assessment which has evaluated the defendant’s need for substance abuse treatment conducted within twelve (12) months preceding the date of the defendant’s sentencing.

In the event a substance abuse evaluation indicates the need for substance abuse treatment, the evaluation shall recommend an appropriate treatment program, together with the estimated costs thereof, and recommendations for other suitable alternative treatment programs, together with the estimated costs thereof. The person shall request that a copy of the completed evaluation be forwarded to the court. The court shall take the evaluation into consideration to determine an appropriate sentence. If a copy of the completed evaluation has not been provided to the court, the court may proceed to sentence the defendant; however, in such event it shall be presumed that substance abuse treatment is needed unless it is shown by a preponderance of evidence that treatment is not required. If the defendant has not made a good faith effort to provide the completed copy of the evaluation to the court, the court may consider the failure of the defendant to provide or report an aggravating circumstance in determining an appropriate sentence. If treatment is ordered, the person or facility performing the evaluation shall not be the person or facility that provides the treatment, unless this requirement is waived by the sentencing court, and with the exception of federally recognized Indian tribes or federal military installations where diagnoses and treatment are appropriate and available. Nothing herein contained shall preclude the use of funds authorized pursuant to the provisions of chapter 3, title 39, Idaho Code, for court ordered substance abuse treatment for indigent defendants.

When sentencing an individual for the crimes enumerated in subsection (1) of this section, the court shall not enter a withheld judgment unless it finds by a preponderance of the evidence that:

The defendant has no prior finding of guilt for any felony, any violation of chapter 80, title 18, Idaho Code, or subsection (a), (b), (c) or (e) of section 37-2732, Idaho Code, whatsoever; and

The sentencing court has an abiding conviction that the defendant will successfully complete the terms of probation; and
(c) The defendant has satisfactorily cooperated with law enforcement authorities in the prosecution of drug related crimes of which the defendant has previously had involvement.

Any person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a violation of the provisions of the Idaho Code identified in subsection (1) of this section shall, when granted a probationary period of any sort whatsoever, be required by the court to complete a period of not less than one hundred (100) hours of community service work.

The requirements for the granting of a withheld judgment pursuant to this subsection shall not apply to a defendant who has been admitted to a problem solving court program approved by the drug court and mental health court coordinating committee and is participating in, or about to begin participating in, such a program, or who participated in such a problem solving court program in connection with the pending case and who successfully graduated from such a program prior to sentencing.

§ 37-2739. Second or subsequent offenses.

Any person convicted of a second or subsequent offense under this act, who is not subject to a fixed minimum term under section 37-2739B, Idaho Code, may be imprisoned for a term up to twice the term otherwise authorized, fined an amount up to twice that otherwise authorized, or both.

For purposes of this section, an offense is considered a second or subsequent offense, if, prior to his conviction of the offense, the offender has at any time been convicted under this act or under any statute of the United States or of any state relating to narcotic drugs, marijuana, depressant, stimulant, or hallucinogenic drugs.

§ 37-2739A. Mandatory minimum penalty.

Any person who is convicted of violating the felony provisions of section 37-2732(a), Idaho Code, by distributing controlled substances to another person, who is not subject to a fixed minimum term under section 37-2739B, Idaho Code, and who has previously been convicted within the past ten (10) years in a court of the United States, any state or a political subdivision of one or more felony offenses of dealing, selling or trafficking in controlled substances on an occasion or occasions different from the felony violation of section 37-2732(a), Idaho Code, and which offense or offenses were punishable in such court by imprisonment in excess of one (1) year, shall be sentenced to the custody of the state board of correction for a mandatory minimum period of time of not less than three (3) years or for such greater period as the court may impose up to a maximum of life imprisonment. The mandatory minimum period of three (3) years incarceration shall not be reduced and shall run consecutively to any other sentence imposed by the court.

§ 37-2739B. Fixed minimum sentences in drug cases.

The legislature intends to allow fixed minimum sentences for certain aggravating factors found in cases brought under the uniform controlled substances act. The legislature hereby finds and declares that trafficking in controlled substances in the state of Idaho is a primary contributor to a societal problem that causes loss of life, personal injury and theft of property, and exacts a tremendous toll on the citizens of this state. To afford better protection to our citizens from those who traffic in controlled substances, the fixed minimum sentencing contained in subsections (b) and (c) of this section is enacted. By enacting fixed minimum sentences, the legislature does not seek to limit a court’s power to impose a greater sentence pursuant to section 19-2513, Idaho Code.

Any person who is found guilty of violating the provisions of section 37-2732(a)(1)(A), Idaho Code, or of any attempt or conspiracy to commit such a crime, may be sentenced to a fixed minimum term of confinement to the custody of the state board of correction, which term shall be at least five (5) years and may extend to life, for each of the following aggravating factors found by the trier of fact:

That the defendant has previously been found guilty of or convicted of a violation of section 37-2732(a)(1)(A), Idaho Code, or of an attempt or conspiracy to commit such a crime, or an offense committed in another jurisdiction which, if committed in this jurisdiction, would be punishable as a violation of section 37-2732(a)(1)(A), Idaho Code, or as an attempt or conspiracy to commit such an offense.

That the violation occurred on or within one thousand (1,000) feet of the property of any public or private primary or secondary school, or in those portions of any building, park, stadium or other structure or grounds which were, at the time of the violation, being used for an activity sponsored by or through such a school.

That the violation consisted of the delivery or attempted delivery of a controlled substance to a minor child under the age of eighteen (18) years.

The fixed minimum terms provided in this section may be imposed where the aggravating factors are separately charged in the information or indictment and admitted by the accused or found to be true by the trier of fact at the trial of the substantive crime; provided, however, that the prosecutor shall give notice to the defendant of intent to seek a fixed penalty at least fourteen (14) days prior to trial. During a fixed minimum term of confinement imposed under this section, the offender shall not be eligible for parole or discharge or credit or reduction of sentence for good conduct except for meritorious service. Each fixed minimum term imposed shall be served consecutively to the others, and consecutively to any minimum term of confinement imposed for the substantive offense.

Any person who is found guilty of violating the provisions of section 37-2732(a)(1)(A), Idaho Code, or of any attempt or conspiracy to commit such a crime, and who is sentenced to serve at least one (1) minimum term of confinement under this section, may be fined an amount up to twice that otherwise provided for the substantive offense.

§ 37-2739C. Medical assistance — Drug-related overdose — Prosecution for possession.

A person acting in good faith who seeks medical assistance for any person experiencing a drug-related medical emergency shall not be charged or prosecuted for possession of a controlled substance pursuant to section 37-2732(c) or (e), Idaho Code, for using or being under the influence of a controlled substance pursuant to section 37-2732C(a), Idaho Code, or for using or possessing with intent to use drug paraphernalia pursuant to section 37-2734A(1), Idaho Code, if the evidence for the charge of possession of or using or being under the influence of a controlled substance or using or possessing drug paraphernalia was obtained as a result of the person seeking medical assistance.

A person who experiences a drug-related medical emergency and is in need of medical assistance shall not be charged or prosecuted for possession of a controlled substance pursuant to section 37-2732(c) or (e), Idaho Code, for using or being under the influence of a controlled substance pursuant to section 37-2732C(a), Idaho Code, or for using or possessing with intent to use drug paraphernalia pursuant to section 37-2734A(1), Idaho Code, if the evidence for the charge of possession of or using or being under the influence of a controlled substance or using or possessing drug paraphernalia was obtained as a result of the medical emergency and the need for medical assistance.

The protections in this section from prosecution shall not be grounds for suppression of evidence in other criminal charges.

§ 37-2740. Powers of enforcement personnel.

Any peace officer, as defined by this act, may:

Carry firearms in the performance of his official duties;

Execute and serve search warrants, arrest warrants, administrative inspection warrants, subpoenas, and summonses issued under the authority of this state;

Make arrests without warrant for any offense under this act committed in his presence, or if he has probable cause to believe that the person to be arrested has committed or is committing a violation of this act which may constitute a felony or a misdemeanor;

Make seizures of property pursuant to this act.

The director of the Idaho state police shall administer the state-level program of Idaho to suppress the unlawful traffic and abuse of controlled substances and shall have the authority to appoint and commission agents to enforce the provisions of this act.

All duly authorized peace officers while investigating offenses under this act in the performance of their official duties, and any person working under their immediate direction, supervision, or instruction, provided such person shall not deviate from the lawful direction of the peace officer, are immune from prosecution under this act.

§ 37-2741. Administrative inspections and warrants.

Issuance and execution of administrative inspection warrants shall be as follows:

A magistrate, within his jurisdiction, and upon proper oath or affirmation showing probable cause, may issue warrants for the purpose of conducting administrative inspections authorized by this act or rules hereunder, and seizures of property appropriate to the inspections. For purposes of the issuance of administrative inspection warrants, probable cause exists upon showing a valid public interest in the effective enforcement of this act or rules hereunder, sufficient to justify administrative inspection of the area, premises, building or conveyance in the circumstances specified in the application for the warrant;

A warrant shall issue only upon an affidavit of a designated officer or employee having knowledge of the facts alleged, sworn to before the judge or magistrate and establishing the grounds for issuing the warrant. If the judge or magistrate is satisfied that grounds for the application exist or that there is probable cause to believe they exist, he shall issue a warrant identifying the area, premises, building, or conveyance to be inspected, the purpose of the inspection, and, if appropriate, the type of property to be inspected, if any. The warrant shall:

State the grounds for its issuance and the name of each person whose affidavit has been taken in support thereof;

Be directed to a person authorized by section 37-2740, Idaho Code, to execute it;

Command the person to whom it is directed to inspect the area, premises, building, or conveyance identified for the purpose specified and, if appropriate, direct the seizure of the property specified;

Identify the item or types of property to be seized, if any;

Direct that it be served during normal business hours and designate the judge or magistrate to whom it shall be returned;

A warrant issued pursuant to this section must be executed and returned within ten (10) days of its date unless, upon a showing of a need for additional time, the court orders otherwise. If property is seized pursuant to a warrant, a copy shall be given to the person from whom or from whose premises the property is taken, together with a receipt for the property taken. The return of the warrant shall be made promptly, accompanied by a written inventory of any property taken. The inventory shall be made in the presence of the person executing the warrant and of the person from whose possession or premises the property was taken, if present, or in the presence of at least one (1) credible person other than the person executing the warrant. A copy of the inventory shall be delivered to the person from whom or from whose premises the property was taken and to the applicant for the warrant;

The judge or magistrate who has issued a warrant shall attach thereto a copy of the return and all papers returnable in connection therewith and file them with the clerk of the court in the county in which the inspection was made.

The board may make administrative inspections of controlled premises in accordance with the following provisions:

For purposes of this section only, “controlled premises” means:

Places where persons registered or exempted from registration requirements under this act are required to keep records; and

Places including factories, warehouses, establishments, and conveyances in which persons registered or exempted from registration requirements under this act are permitted to hold, manufacture, compound, process, sell, deliver, or otherwise dispose of any controlled substance.
(2) When authorized by an administrative inspection warrant issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this section an officer or employee designated by the board, upon presenting the warrant and appropriate credentials to the owner, operator, or agent in charge, may enter controlled premises for the purpose of conducting an administrative inspection.

Inventory any stock of any controlled substance therein and obtain samples thereof;

In any other exceptional or emergency circumstance where time or opportunity to apply for a warrant is lacking; or

In all other situations in which a warrant is not constitutionally required;

(3) When authorized by an administrative inspection warrant, an officer or employee designated by the board may:

(A) Inspect and copy records required by this act to be kept;

(B) Inspect, within reasonable limits and in a reasonable manner, controlled premises and all pertinent equipment, finished and unfinished material, containers and labeling found therein, and, except as provided in subsection (b)(5) of this section, all other things therein, including records, files, papers, processes, controls, and facilities bearing on violation of this act; and

(4) This section does not prevent the inspection without a warrant of books and records pursuant to an administrative subpoena issued in accordance with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, nor does it prevent entries and administrative inspections, including seizures of property, without a warrant:

(A) If the owner, operator, or agent in charge of the controlled premises consents;

(B) In situations presenting imminent danger to health or safety;

(C) In situations involving inspection of conveyances if there is reasonable cause to believe that the mobility of the conveyance makes it impracticable to obtain a warrant;

(5) An inspection authorized by this section shall not extend to financial data, sales data, other than shipment data, or pricing data unless the owner, operator, or agent in charge of the controlled premises consents in writing.

§ 37-2741A. Utility records — Inspection and copying — Wrongful disclosure.

Upon request of the attorney general or prosecuting attorney, a subpoena for the production of records of a utility may be signed and issued by a magistrate judge if there is reasonable articulable suspicion that a violation of the provisions of section 37-2732, 37-2732B, 37-2733, 37-2734 or 37-2734A, Idaho Code, has occurred or is occurring and that the records sought will materially aid in the investigation of such activity or appear reasonably calculated to lead to the discovery of information that will do so. The subpoena shall be served on the utility as in civil actions. The court may, upon motion timely made and in any event before the time specified for compliance with the subpoena, condition compliance upon advancement by the attorney general or prosecuting attorney of the reasonable costs of producing the records specified in the subpoena.

A response to a subpoena issued under this section is sufficient if a copy or printout, duly authenticated by an authorized representative of the utility as a true and correct copy or printout of its records, is provided, unless otherwise provided in the subpoena for good cause shown.

Except as provided in this subsection, a utility served with a subpoena under this section may disclose to the customer the fact that a subpoena seeking records relating to the customer has been served. A magistrate judge may order that the attorney general, prosecuting attorney or utility refrain from disclosing the fact that a subpoena has been served.

A utility shall be reimbursed in an amount set by the court for reasonable costs incurred in providing information pursuant to the provisions of this section.

The provisions of this section do not preclude the use of other legally authorized means of obtaining records, nor preclude the assertion of any legally recognized privileges or the right to seek a protective order where appropriate.

Disclosure by the attorney general, county prosecuting attorney, or any peace officer or other person designated by the attorney general or the county prosecuting attorney, of information obtained under this section, except in the proper discharge of official duties, is punishable as a misdemeanor.

Upon filing of any civil or criminal action, the nondisclosure requirements of any subpoena or order under this section shall terminate, and the attorney general or prosecuting attorney filing the action shall provide copies to the defendant of all subpoenas or other orders issued under this section.

A good faith reliance on a court order by a utility shall constitute a complete defense to any civil or criminal action brought against such utility under the laws of this state.

The term “utility,” as used herein, shall mean every corporation, association, company, partnership, sole proprietorship, business entity, person, or any municipal corporation, mutual nonprofit or cooperative corporation which provides water, gas or electrical services to members of the public, for compensation, within the state of Idaho.

§ 37-2742. Injunctions.

The district courts have jurisdiction to restrain or enjoin violations of this act.

The defendant may demand trial by jury for an alleged violation of an injunction or restraining order under this section.

§ 37-2743. Cooperative arrangements.

The director of the Idaho state police shall cooperate with federal and other state agencies in discharging his responsibilities concerning traffic in controlled substances and in suppressing the abuse of controlled substances. To this end, he may:

Arrange for the exchange of information among governmental officials concerning the use and abuse of controlled substances;

Coordinate and cooperate in training programs concerning controlled substance law enforcement at local and state levels;

Cooperate with the bureau by establishing a centralized unit to accept, catalogue, file, and collect statistics, including records of drug dependent persons and other controlled substance law offenders within the state, and make the information available for federal, state and local law enforcement purposes. The name or identity of a patient or research subject whose identity could not be obtained under subsection (c) of this section shall be subject to disclosure according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code;

Conduct programs of eradication aimed at destroying wild or illicit growth of plant species from which controlled substance may be extracted;

Enter into agreements with other states to coordinate and facilitate the enforcement of this act; and

Require law enforcement agencies to report such information regarding traffic in controlled substances and abuse of controlled substances as he deems necessary to enforce this act. Such reports shall be on forms supplied by the director of the Idaho state police and shall include, but not be limited to, the following information: Names, ages, sex, race, and residences of individuals involved in violations of this act; the contraband confiscated, showing the kind, location, quantity, date, and place where seized; the circumstances surrounding the arrests and a report of the disposition of charges.

Results, information, and evidence received from the bureau relating to the regulatory functions of this act, including results of inspections and investigations conducted by the bureau may be relied and acted upon by the board in the exercise of its regulatory functions under this act.

A practitioner engaged in medical practice or research is not required or compelled to furnish the name or identity of a patient or research subject to the director, nor may he be compelled in any state or local civil, criminal, administrative, legislative or other proceedings to furnish the name or identity of an individual that the practitioner is obligated to keep confidential and as such the name or identity of the patient or research subject is subject to disclosure according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code.